Maine, session 132, LD722.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to establish and maintain an emergency medical services
education administrative structure as required by Maine Emergency Medical Services rules
and external accreditation standards.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,000,000 $5,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $5,000,000 $5,000,000